test/src/morphology/N-talo40_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - talo: # Noun (40) talo 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     talo+N+Sg+Nom: talo
     talo+N+Sg+Gen: talo
     talo+N+Sg+Par: tallo
     talo+N+Sg+Ill: tallo
     talo+N+Pl+Gen: [tallõ, talla]
     talo+N+Pl+Par: [tallõ, talla]
     talo+N+Pl+Ill: [tallõhe, tallõ, tallahe, talla]
     talo+N+Pl+All: [tallõlõ, talõlõ, tallalõ, talalõ]
